Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.270

Criminal profiteering—Asset recovery.

All assets recovered pursuant to RCW 43.10.260 shall be distributed in the following manner: (1) For drug asset forfeitures, pursuant to the provisions of RCW 69.50.505; and (2) for criminal profiteering cases, pursuant to the provisions of RCW 9A.82.100.

[ 1991 c 345 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—1991 c 345: See note following RCW 43.10.260.